Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-240.15
Permitted improvements and growing crops of lessee; appraisers; qualified; oath.

The appraisers shall be qualified by the county judge and an oath administered in the same manner as required by sections 76-707 and 76-708.

Laws 1967, c. 467, § 6, p. 1453.